District of Columbia statutes.
29-911

Meetings; regular and special — Notice.

The secretary shall give notice of the time and place of meetings by sending a notice thereof to each member at the member’s last known address not less than the number of days in advance of the meeting specified in the bylaws. In case of a special meeting, the notice shall specify the purpose for which the meeting is called. If authorized by the articles or bylaws, the notice may be sent by electronic mail in accordance with § 29-305.09.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(5), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-911.
1981 Ed., § 29-1111.
1973 Ed., § 29-811.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the last sentence.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.